src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
!! Proper noun inflection
!! ----------------------
!! The HUNGARIAN language proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but with a colon (':') as separator.

LEXICON PROP_MACSKA__n
+N+Prop: NMN_MACSKA ;
LEXICON	 PROP_HANG__n
+N+Prop: NMN_HANG ;
LEXICON	PROP_ADÓ__n
+N+Prop: NMN_ADÓ ;
LEXICON PROP_ADÁS__n
+N+Prop: NMN_ADÁS ;
LEXICON PROP_SÖR__n
+N+Prop: NMN_SÖR ;
LEXICON PROP_BÉKE__n
+N+Prop: NMN_BÉKE ;
LEXICON PROP_ESÉS__n
+N+Prop: NMN_ESÉS ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
