src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
!! Proper nouns
!! --------
!! Proper nouns in the HUNGARIAN language are references to things.

LEXICON Propernouns
Ázsia:Ázsia PROP_MACSKA__n ;
Észak:Észak PROP_HANG__n ;
Óceánia:Óceánia PROP_MACSKA__n ;
Albin:Albin PROP_HANG__n ;
Alfréd:Alfréd PROP_HANG__n ;
Ármin:Ármin PROP_HANG__n ;
Benjámin:Benjámin PROP_HANG__n ;
Darwin:Darwin PROP_HANG__n ;
Dávid:Dávid PROP_HANG__n ;
Jusztin:Jusztin PROP_HANG__n ;
Katalin:Katalin PROP_HANG__n ;
Klotild:Klotild PROP_HANG__n ;
Konstantin:Konstantin PROP_HANG__n ;
Malvin:Malvin PROP_HANG__n ;
Matild:Matild PROP_HANG__n ;
Patrik:Patrik PROP_HANG__n ;
Ulrik:Ulrik PROP_HANG__n ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
